Utah statutes.
17-15-23.   County solid waste management plans.
(1) (a)  Each county or entity created or designated by a county for this
purpose shall submit to the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board, organized
in Section  19-6-103, a county solid waste management plan providing solid
waste management information as reasonably required by the board and according
to a timetable established by the board.
(b)  Each county shall review and modify its solid waste management plan no
less frequently than every five years.
(2)  Each county solid waste management plan shall be consistent with Title
19, Chapter 6, Part 5, Solid Waste Management Act, and shall establish the
county's solid waste management plan for the next 20 years.
(3)  Each county solid waste management plan shall include an estimate of the
solid waste capacity needed in the county for the next 20 years and the
county's program to ensure that the county will have sufficient solid waste
disposal capacity for the next 20 years.
(4)  The solid waste management plan mandated by this section is contingent
upon the adoption and implementation of a funding mechanism.  Nothing
contained in this section precludes a political subdivision, local health
department, or district from undertaking comprehensive solid waste planning.
